New Mexico, session 2026, SB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 59A, Article 22 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] CORONARY ARTERY CALCIUM SCREENING AND CHOLESTEROL LIPID PANELS COVERAGE.-- A. An individual or group health insurance policy, health care plan or certificate of health insurance that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state shall provide coverage for an eligible insured to receive a coronary artery calcium screening and low-density lipoprotein panels. B. Coverage provided pursuant to this section shall: (1) be limited to the provision of a coronary artery calcium screening to an eligible insured at the discretion of a health care provider to be used as a clinical management tool; (2) be provided every five years if an eligible insured has previously received a coronary artery calcium score of zero; (3) not be required for future coronary artery calcium screenings if an eligible insured receives a coronary artery calcium score greater than zero; and (4) not impose cost sharing on an eligible insured over the age of forty-nine, unless the eligible insured has a first degree relative with a medical history of a myocardial infarction before the age of forty. C. The provisions of this section do not apply to short-term travel, accident-only or limited or specified disease policies, plans or certificates of health insurance, catastrophic plans as defined under 42 USCA Section 18022(e) or high-deductible health plans with health savings accounts until an eligible insured's deductible has been met, unless otherwise permitted by federal law. D. As used in this section: (1) "cholesterol lipid panels" means blood tests that measure one or more of the following: (a) total cholesterol; (b) low-density lipoprotein cholesterol; (c) high-density lipoprotein cholesterol; (d) lipoprotein (a); (e) triglycerides; and (f) high-sensitivity c-reactive protein; (2) "coronary artery calcium screening" means a computed tomography scan measuring coronary artery calcium for atherosclerosis and abnormal artery structure and function; (3) "cost sharing" means deductibles, copayments or coinsurance; and (4) "health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner or other health care professional authorized to furnish health care services within the scope of the professional's license." SECTION 2. A new section of Chapter 59A, Article 22 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] COVERAGE FOR MEDICATIONS USED FOR THE TREATMENT OF CHOLESTEROL DISORDER.-- A. An individual or group health insurance policy, health care plan or certificate of health insurance that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides coverage for cholesterol-lowering medications shall not impose cost sharing on generic medications. B. Cost sharing shall not be imposed on second-line step therapy medications if generic medications: (1) fail to lower low-density lipoprotein in the blood to below sixty milligrams per deciliter or another level deemed appropriate by a patient's health care provider; or (2) generate adverse reactions not tolerated by the patient, as determined by the prescribing health care provider. C. The provisions of this section do not apply to excepted benefit plans as provided pursuant to the Short-Term Health Plan and Excepted Benefit Act, catastrophic plans as defined pursuant to 42 USCA Section 18022(e) or high-deductible health plans with health savings accounts until an eligible insured's deductible has been met, unless otherwise allowed pursuant to federal law. D. For the purposes of this section, "cost sharing" means a copayment, coinsurance, a deductible or any other form of financial obligation of the enrollee other than a premium or a share of a premium, or any combination of any of these financial obligations, as defined by the terms of an individual or group health insurance policy, health care plan or certificate of health insurance." SECTION 3. Section 59A-23-7.16 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2020, Chapter 79, Section 3) is amended to read: "59A-23-7.16. [HEART] CORONARY ARTERY CALCIUM [SCAN] SCREENING AND CHOLESTEROL LIPID PANELS COVERAGE.-- A. A group health plan, other than a small group health plan or a blanket health insurance policy or contract that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state shall provide coverage for eligible insureds to receive a [heart] coronary artery calcium [scan] screening and cholesterol lipid panels. B. Coverage provided pursuant to this section shall: (1) be limited to the provision of a [heart] coronary artery calcium [scan] screening to an eligible insured at the discretion of a health care provider to be used as a clinical management tool; (2) be provided every five years if an eligible insured has previously received a [heart] coronary artery calcium score of zero; [and] (3) not be required for future [heart] coronary artery calcium [scans] screenings if an eligible insured receives a [heart] coronary artery calcium score greater than zero; and (4) not impose cost sharing on an eligible insured over the age of forty-nine, unless the eligible insured has a first degree relative with a medical history of a myocardial infarction before the age of forty. [C. At its discretion or as required by law, an insurer may offer or refuse coverage for further cardiac testing or procedures for eligible insureds based upon the results of a heart artery calcium scan. D.] C. The provisions of this section do not apply to short-term travel, accident-only or limited or specified-disease policies, plans or certificates of health insurance, catastrophic plans as defined under 42 USCA Section 18022(e) or high-deductible health plans with health savings accounts until a covered person's deductible has been met, unless otherwise permitted by federal law. [E.] D. As used in this section: [(1) "eligible insured" means an insured who: (a) is a person between the ages of forty-five and sixty-five; and (b) has an intermediate risk of developing coronary heart disease as determined by a health care provider based upon a score calculated from an evidence-based algorithm widely used in the medical community to assess a person's ten-year cardiovascular disease risk, including a score calculated using a pooled cohort equation; (2) "health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner or other health care professional authorized to furnish health care services within the scope of the professional's license; and (3) "heart] (1) "cholesterol lipid panels" means blood tests that measure one or more of the following: (a) total cholesterol; (b) low-density lipoprotein cholesterol; (c) high-density lipoprotein cholesterol; (d) lipoprotein (a); (e) triglycerides; and (f) high-sensitivity c-reactive protein; (2) "coronary artery calcium [scan] screening" means a computed tomography scan measuring coronary artery calcium for atherosclerosis and abnormal artery structure and function; (3) "cost sharing" means deductibles, copayments or coinsurance; and (4) "health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner or other health care professional authorized to furnish health care services within the scope of the professional's license." SECTION 4. A new section of Chapter 59A, Article 23 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] COVERAGE FOR MEDICATIONS USED FOR THE TREATMENT OF CHOLESTEROL DISORDER.-- A. A group or blanket health insurance policy, health care plan or certificate of health insurance that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides coverage for cholesterol-lowering medications shall not impose cost sharing on generic medications. B. Cost sharing shall not be imposed on second-line step therapy medications if generic medications: (1) fail to lower low-density lipoprotein in the blood to below sixty milligrams per deciliter or another level deemed appropriate by a patient's health care provider; or (2) generate adverse reactions not tolerated by the patient, as determined by the prescribing health care provider. C. The provisions of this section do not apply to excepted benefit plans as provided pursuant to the Short-Term Health Plan and Excepted Benefit Act, catastrophic plans as defined pursuant to 42 USCA Section 18022(e) or high-deductible health plans with health savings accounts until an eligible insured's deductible has been met, unless otherwise allowed pursuant to federal law. D. For the purposes of this section, "cost sharing" means a copayment, coinsurance, a deductible or any other form of financial obligation of an insured other than a premium or a share of a premium, or any combination of any of these financial obligations, as defined by the terms of a group or blanket health insurance policy, health care plan or certificate of health insurance." SECTION 5. Section 59A-46-50.5 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2020, Chapter 79, Section 4) is amended to read: "59A-46-50.5. [HEART] CORONARY ARTERY CALCIUM [SCAN] SCREENING AND CHOLESTEROL LIPID PANELS COVERAGE.-- A. A group health maintenance organization contract, other than a small group health maintenance organization contract, that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state shall provide coverage for eligible enrollees to receive a [heart] coronary artery calcium [scan] screening and cholesterol lipid panels. B. Coverage provided pursuant to this section shall: (1) be limited to the provision of a [heart] coronary artery calcium [scan] screening to an eligible enrollee at the discretion of a health care provider to be used as a clinical management tool; (2) be provided every five years if an eligible enrollee has previously received a [heart] coronary artery calcium score of zero; [and] (3) not be required for future [heart] coronary artery calcium [scans] screenings if an eligible enrollee receives a [heart] coronary artery calcium score greater than zero; and (4) not impose cost sharing on an eligible enrollee over the age of forty-nine, unless the eligible enrollee has a first degree relative with a medical history of a myocardial infarction before the age of forty. [C. At its discretion or as required by law, a carrier may offer or refuse coverage for further cardiac testing or procedures for eligible enrollees based upon the results of a heart artery calcium scan. D.] C. The provisions of this section do not apply to short-term travel, accident-only or limited or specified-disease policies, plans or certificates of health insurance, catastrophic plans as defined under 42 USCA Section 18022(e) or high-deductible health plans with health savings accounts until a covered person's deductible has been met, unless otherwise permitted by federal law. [E.] D. As used in this section: [(1) "eligible enrollee" means an enrollee who: (a) is a person between the ages of forty-five and sixty-five; and (b) has an intermediate risk of developing coronary heart disease as determined by a health care provider based upon a score calculated from an evidence-based algorithm widely used in the medical community to assess a person's ten-year cardiovascular disease risk, including a score calculated using a pooled cohort equation; (2) "health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner or other health care professional authorized to furnish health care services within the scope of the professional's license; and (3) "heart] (1) "cholesterol lipid panels" means blood tests that measure one or more of the following: (a) total cholesterol; (b) low-density lipoprotein cholesterol; (c) high-density lipoprotein cholesterol; (d) lipoprotein (a); (e) triglycerides; and (f) high-sensitivity c-reactive protein; (2) "coronary artery calcium [scan] screening" means a computed tomography scan measuring coronary artery calcium for atherosclerosis and abnormal artery structure and function; (3) "cost sharing" means deductibles, copayments or coinsurance; and (4) "health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner or other health care professional authorized to furnish health care services within the scope of the professional's license." SECTION 6. A new section of the Health Maintenance Organization Law is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] COVERAGE FOR MEDICATIONS USED FOR THE TREATMENT OF CHOLESTEROL DISORDER.-- A. An individual or group health maintenance organization contract that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides coverage for cholesterol-lowering medications shall not impose cost sharing on generic medications. B. Cost sharing shall not be imposed on second-line step therapy medications if generic medications: (1) fail to lower low-density lipoprotein in the blood to below sixty milligrams per deciliter or another level deemed appropriate by a patient's health care provider; or (2) generate adverse reactions not tolerated by the patient, as determined by the prescribing health care provider. C. The provisions of this section do not apply to excepted benefit plans as provided pursuant to the Short-Term Health Plan and Excepted Benefit Act, catastrophic plans as defined pursuant to 42 USCA Section 18022(e) or high-deductible health plans with health savings accounts until an enrollee's deductible has been met, unless otherwise allowed pursuant to federal law. D. For the purposes of this section, "cost sharing" means a copayment, coinsurance, a deductible or any other form of financial obligation of an enrollee other than a premium or a share of a premium, or any combination of any of these financial obligations, as defined by the terms of an individual or group health maintenance organization contract." SECTION 7. Section 59A-47-45.7 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2020, Chapter 79, Section 5) is amended to read: "59A-47-45.7. [HEART] CORONARY ARTERY CALCIUM [SCAN] SCREENING AND CHOLESTEROL LIPID PANELS COVERAGE.-- A. A group health care plan, other than a small group health care plan, that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state shall provide coverage for eligible subscribers to receive a [heart] coronary artery calcium [scan] screening and cholesterol lipid panels. B. Coverage provided pursuant to this section shall: (1) be limited to the provision of a [heart] coronary artery calcium [scan] screening to an eligible subscriber at the discretion of a health care provider to be used as a clinical management tool; (2) be provided every five years if an eligible subscriber has previously received a [heart] coronary artery calcium score of zero; [and] (3) not be required for future [heart] coronary artery calcium [scans] screenings if an eligible subscriber receives a [heart] coronary artery calcium score greater than zero; and (4) not impose cost sharing on an eligible subscriber over the age of forty-nine, unless the eligible subscriber has a first degree relative with a medical history of a myocardial infarction before the age of forty. [C. At its discretion or as required by law, a health care plan may offer or refuse coverage for further cardiac testing or procedures for eligible subscribers based upon the results of a heart artery calcium scan. D.] C. The provisions of this section do not apply to short-term travel, accident-only or limited or specified-disease policies, plans or certificates of health insurance, catastrophic plans as defined under 42 USCA Section 18022(e) or high-deductible health plans with health savings accounts until a covered person's deductible has been met, unless otherwise permitted by federal law. [E.] D. As used in this section: [(1) "eligible subscriber" means a subscriber who: (a) is a person between the ages of forty-five and sixty-five; and (b) has an intermediate risk of developing coronary heart disease as determined by a health care provider based upon a score calculated from an evidence-based algorithm widely used in the medical community to assess a person's ten-year cardiovascular disease risk, including a score calculated using a pooled cohort equation; (2) "health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner or other health care professional authorized to furnish health care services within the scope of the professional's license; and (3) "heart] (1) "cholesterol lipid panels" means blood tests that measure one or more of the following: (a) total cholesterol; (b) low-density lipoprotein cholesterol; (c) high-density lipoprotein cholesterol; (d) lipoprotein (a); (e) triglycerides; and (f) high-sensitivity c-reactive protein; (2) "coronary artery calcium [scan] screening" means a computed tomography scan measuring coronary artery calcium for atherosclerosis and abnormal artery structure and function; (3) "cost sharing" means deductibles, copayments or coinsurance; and (4) "health care provider" means a physician, physician assistant, nurse practitioner or other health care professional authorized to furnish health care services within the scope of the professional's license." SECTION 8. A new section of the Nonprofit Health Care Plan Law is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] COVERAGE FOR MEDICATIONS USED FOR THE TREATMENT OF CHOLESTEROL DISORDER.-- A. An individual or group health care plan that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state that provides coverage for cholesterol-lowering medications shall not impose cost sharing on generic medications. B. Cost sharing shall not be imposed on second-line step therapy medications if generic medications: (1) fail to lower low-density lipoprotein in the blood to below sixty milligrams per deciliter or another level deemed appropriate by a patient's health care provider; or (2) generate adverse reactions not tolerated by the patient, as determined by the prescribing health care provider. C. The provisions of this section do not apply to excepted benefit plans as provided pursuant to the Short-Term Health Plan and Excepted Benefit Act, catastrophic plans as defined pursuant to 42 USCA Section 18022(e) or high-deductible health plans with health savings accounts until a subscriber's deductible has been met, unless otherwise allowed pursuant to federal law. D. For the purposes of this section, "cost sharing" means a copayment, coinsurance, a deductible or any other form of financial obligation of a subscriber other than a premium or a share of a premium, or any combination of any of these financial obligations, as defined by the terms of an individual or group health care plan." SECTION 9. Section 61-11-6 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1969, Chapter 29, Section 5, as amended) is amended to read: "61-11-6. POWERS AND DUTIES OF BOARD.-- A. The board shall: (1) promulgate rules in accordance with the provisions of the State Rules Act to carry out the provisions of the Pharmacy Act in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Licensing Act; (2) provide for examinations of applicants for licensure as pharmacists; (3) provide for the issuance and renewal of licenses for pharmacists; (4) require and establish criteria for continuing education as a condition of renewal of licensure for pharmacists; (5) provide for the issuance and renewal of licenses for pharmacist interns and for their training, supervision and discipline; (6) provide for the licensing of retail pharmacies, nonresident pharmacies, wholesale drug distributors, drug manufacturers, hospital pharmacies, nursing home drug facilities, industrial and public health clinics and all places where dangerous drugs are stored, distributed, dispensed or administered and provide for the inspection of the facilities and activities; (7) enforce the provisions of all laws of the state pertaining to the practice of pharmacy and the manufacture, production, sale or distribution of drugs or cosmetics and their standards of strength and purity; (8) conduct hearings upon charges relating to the discipline of a registrant or licensee or the denial, suspension or revocation of a registration or a license in accordance with the Uniform Licensing Act; (9) cause the prosecution of any person violating the Pharmacy Act, the New Mexico Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act or the Controlled Substances Act; (10) keep a record of all proceedings of the board; (11) make an annual report to the governor; (12) appoint and employ, in the board's discretion, a qualified person who is not a member of the board to serve as executive director and define the executive director's duties and responsibilities; except that the power to deny, revoke or suspend any license or registration authorized by the Pharmacy Act shall not be delegated by the board; (13) appoint and employ inspectors necessary to enforce the provisions of all acts under the administration of the board, which inspectors shall be pharmacists and have all the powers and duties of peace officers; (14) provide for other qualified employees necessary to carry out the provisions of the Pharmacy Act; (15) have the authority to employ a competent attorney to give advice and counsel in regard to any matter connected with the duties of the board, to represent the board in any legal proceedings and to aid in the enforcement of the laws in relation to the pharmacy profession and to fix the compensation to be paid to the attorney; provided, however, that the attorney shall be compensated from the money of the board, including that provided for in Section 61-11-19 NMSA 1978; (16) register and regulate qualifications, training and permissible activities of pharmacy technicians; (17) provide a registry of all persons licensed as pharmacists or pharmacist interns in the state; (18) promulgate rules that prescribe the activities and duties of pharmacy owners and pharmacists in the provision of pharmaceutical care, emergency prescription dispensing, drug regimen review and patient counseling in each practice setting; (19) promulgate, after approval by the New Mexico medical board and the board of nursing, rules and protocols for the prescribing of dangerous drug therapy, including vaccines and immunizations, and the appropriate notification of the primary or appropriate physician of the person receiving the dangerous drug therapy; [and] (20) have the authority to authorize emergency prescription dispensing; and (21) promulgate rules and establish protocols for the assessment of cardiovascular risk and the prescribing of lipid-lowering or cardiovascular plaque-reducing dangerous drug therapies based on a person's level of cardiovascular risk in accordance with standards of care. B. The board may: (1) delegate its authority to the executive director to issue temporary licenses as provided in Section 61-11-14 NMSA 1978; (2) provide by rule for the electronic transmission of prescriptions; and (3) delegate its authority to the executive director to authorize emergency prescription dispensing procedures during civil or public health emergencies." SECTION 10. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act apply to group health insurance policies, health care plans or certificates of health insurance that are delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2027. SECTION 11. EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is January 1, 2027. - 21 -